North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 1. Board of Directors.

§ 55A-8-01.
Requirement for and duties of board.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, each corporation shall have a board of directors.

All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the affairs of the corporation managed under the direction of, its board of directors, except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation.

A corporation may dispense with or limit the authority of a board of directors by describing in its articles of incorporation who will perform some or all of the duties of a board of directors; but no such limitation upon the authority which the board of directors would otherwise have shall be effective against other persons without actual knowledge of such limitation.

To the extent the articles of incorporation vests authority of the board of directors in an individual or group other than the board of directors, the individual or group in the exercise of such authority shall be deemed to be acting as the board of directors for all purposes of this Chapter.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 18; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Subsection (c) of this section permits a corporation to dispense with or limit the authority of its board of directors only by a provision in its articles of incorporation; it does not permit a members’ agreement to effect such an arrangement, in contrast with

G.S. 55-8-01(c)

which permits a shareholders’ agreement to do so.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-02.
Qualifications of directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of this State or a member of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws so prescribe.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 18; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-8-03.
Number of directors.

A board of directors shall consist of one or more natural persons, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The number of directors may be increased or decreased from time to time by amendment to or in the manner prescribed in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may establish a variable range for the size of the board of directors by fixing a minimum and maximum number of directors. If a variable range is established, the number of directors may be fixed or changed from time to time, within the minimum and maximum, by the members entitled to vote for directors or (unless the articles of incorporation or an agreement valid under

G.S. 55A-7-30

shall otherwise provide) the board of directors. If the corporation has members entitled to vote for directors, only such members may change the range for the size of the board or change from a fixed to a variable-range size board or vice versa.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 192, ss. 1, 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 19-21; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-04.
Election, designation, and appointment of directors.

If the corporation has members entitled to vote for directors, all the directors (except the initial directors) shall be elected at the first annual meeting of such members, and at each annual meeting thereafter, unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide some other time or method of election, or provide that some of the directors are appointed by some other person or are designated. If the articles of incorporation authorize dividing the members into classes, the articles of incorporation may also authorize the election of all or a specified number of directors by the members of one or more authorized classes.

If the corporation does not have members entitled to vote for directors, all the directors (except the initial directors) shall be elected, appointed, or designated as provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. If no method of designation or appointment is set forth in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the directors (other than the initial directors) shall be elected by the board of directors.

If any member entitled to vote for directors so demands, election of directors by the members shall be by ballot, unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws otherwise provide.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 192, ss. 1, 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 19-21; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-05.
Terms of directors generally.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may specify the terms of directors. In the absence of a contrary provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the term of each director shall be one year, and directors may serve successive terms.

A decrease in the number of directors or term of office does not shorten an incumbent director’s term.

Except as provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws:

The term of a director filling a vacancy in the office of a director elected by members expires at the next election of directors by members; and

The term of a director filling any other vacancy expires at the end of the unexpired term that such director is filling.

Despite the expiration of a director’s term, the director continues to serve until the director’s successor is elected, designated, or appointed and qualifies, or until there is a decrease in the number of directors.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 192, ss. 1, 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 19-21; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 509, s. 28.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-06.
Staggered terms for directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into groups. The terms of office of the several groups need not be uniform.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 192, ss. 1, 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 19-21; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-07.
Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by communicating his resignation to the board of directors, its presiding officer, or to the corporation.

A resignation is effective when it is communicated unless the notice specifies a later effective date or subsequent event upon which it will become effective.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-8-08.
Removal of directors elected by members or directors.

The members may remove one or more directors elected by them with or without cause unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

If a director is elected by a class, chapter or other organizational unit, or by region or other geographic grouping, the director may be removed only by that class, chapter, unit, or grouping.

Except as provided in subsection (i) of this section, a director may be removed under subsection (a) or (b) of this section, only if the number of votes cast to remove the director would be sufficient to elect the director at a meeting to elect directors.

If cumulative voting is authorized, a director shall not be removed:

If the number of votes; or

If the director was elected by a class, chapter, unit, or grouping of members, the number of votes of that class, chapter, unit, or grouping;

sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting, if an election were then being held, is voted against the director’s removal.

A director elected by members may be removed by the members only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the meeting notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

In computing whether a director is protected from removal under subsections (b) through (d) of this section, it should be assumed that the votes against removal are cast in an election for the number of directors of the class to which the director to be removed belonged on the date of that director’s election.

An entire board of directors may be removed under subsections (a) through (e) of this section.

A majority of the directors then in office or such greater number as is set forth in the articles of incorporation or bylaws may, subject to any limitation in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, remove any director elected by the board of directors; provided, however, that a director elected by the board to fill the vacancy of a director elected by the members may be removed by the members, but not the board.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if, at the beginning of a director’s term on the board of directors, the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide that the director may be removed by the board for missing a specified number of board meetings, the board may remove the director for failing to attend the specified number of meetings. The director may be removed only if a majority of the directors then in office vote for the removal.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide that directors elected after the effective date of such provision shall be removed automatically for missing a specified number of board meetings.

The articles of incorporation may:

Limit the application of this section in the case of a charitable or religious corporation; and

Set forth the vote and procedures by which the board of directors or any person may remove with or without cause a director elected by the members or the board.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 192, ss. 1, 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 19-21; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Subsections (i) and (j) had no counterpart in the prior law. Subdivision (k)(1) was limited to charitable or religious corporations in order not to give other nonprofit corporations, in which members may have property rights, full power to limit the application of the section in general. Subdivision (k)(2) was not so limited in order not to invalidate procedures adopted under former G.S. 55A-20(f) and to authorize such procedures to be established under the new Act.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-09.
Removal of designated or appointed directors.

A designated director may be removed by an amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws deleting or changing the provision containing the designation.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws:

An appointed director may be removed with or without cause by the person appointing the director;

The person removing the director shall do so by giving written notice of the removal to the director and to the corporation; and

A removal is effective when the notice is effective unless the notice specifies a future effective date.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide that directors appointed after the effective date of such provision shall be removed automatically for missing a specified number of board meetings.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 192, ss. 1, 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 19-21; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-10.
Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

The superior court of the county where a corporation’s principal office (or, if there is none in this State, its registered office) is located may remove any director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation or by its members holding at least ten percent (10%) of the votes entitled to be cast of any class of members, if the court finds that:

The director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct, or gross abuse of authority or discretion, with respect to the corporation, or a final judgment has been entered finding that the director has violated a duty set forth in

G.S. 55A-8-30

through

G.S. 55A-8-33

, and

Removal is in the best interest of the corporation.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from serving on the board of directors for a period prescribed by the court.

If members commence a proceeding under subsection (a) of this section, the corporation shall be made a party defendant.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-11.
Vacancy on board.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, and except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, if a vacancy occurs on a board of directors, including, without limitation, a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors or from the failure by the members to elect the full authorized number of directors, the vacancy may be filled:

By the members entitled to vote for directors, if any, or if the vacant office was held by a director elected by a class, chapter or other organizational unit, or by region or other geographic grouping, by the members of that class, chapter, unit, or grouping;

By the board of directors; or

If the directors remaining in the office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board, by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors, or by the sole director, remaining in office.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, if a vacant office was held by an appointed director, only the person who appointed the director may fill the vacancy.

If a vacant office was held by a designated director, the vacancy shall be filled only as provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date (by reason of a resignation effective at a later date under G.S. 55A-8-07(b) or otherwise) may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director shall not take office until the vacancy occurs.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-8-12.
Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 26; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§§ 55A-8-13 through 55A-8-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.